src/phonology/hun-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Hungarian morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 á é ó ú í ö ü ő ű
 æ ø å à è ò ù ì ä ë ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 Á É Ó Ú Í Ö Ü Ő Ű
 Æ Ø Å À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý Þ Ñ Ð ß Ç

!! TRIGGERS
%^Ö2:0		!!= * @CODE@ h%^Ö2z
%^V2:0		!!= * @CODE@ %^V2al 
%^Hist:0         !!= * @CODE@ historic documents
%^Pen:0		!!= * @CODE@ penultimate position
%^RmVow:0	!!= * @CODE@ remove vowel
%^V2VV:0	!!= * @CODE@ lengthen vowel
%^VV2V:0	!!= * @CODE@ shorten vowel
 %>
 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u á é ó ú í ő ű ö ü
       A E I O U Á É Ó Ú Í Ő Ű Ö Ü
       æ ø å à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 VowAndY = Vow y Y ;

 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ 
       B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z Ð Þ ;
 
Rules

"Stem-final vowel lengthening"
 Vx:Vy <=> _ %^V2VV: %> ;
     where Vx in (a A e E)
           Vy in (á Á é É)
       matched ;
!! béke+N+Sg+PxSg3
!!€ béke%^V2VV%>je
!!€ béké0%>je

"Penultimate Stem vowel shortening"
 Vx:Vy <=> _ [ Cns:+ |Cns:+ y ] %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
      where Vx in (ű Ű ő Ő ú Ú ó Ó é É í Í á Á)
      	    Vy in (ü Ü ö Ö u U o O e E i I a A)
	    matched ;
!! madár+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ madár%^Pen%^VV2V%>ak
!!€ madar00%>ak

"Penultimate Stem vowel removal"
 Vx:0 <=> _ [ Cns:+ |Cns:+ y ] %^Pen: %^RmVow: ;
      where Vx in (ü Ü ö Ö u U o O e E i I a A) ;
!! forradalom+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ forradalom%^Pen%^RmVow%>ak
!!€ forradal0m00%>ak

"Stem-final vowel removal"
 Vx:0 <=> _ %^RmVow: ;
      where Vx in (ű Ű ő Ő ú Ú ó Ó u U i I) ;
!! falu+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ falu%^RmVow%>vak
!!€ fal00%>vak

"Assimilation to stem-final consonant"
 0:Cx <=> Cx _ %> %^V2: ;
     where Cx in (b c d f g j k l m n p r t v) ;

"Assimilation to stem-final consonant followed by y"
 0:Cx <=> Cx _ y %> %^V2: ;
    where Cx in (d l n r t) ;

"Assimilation to stem-final zs cs "
 0:Cx <=> Cx _ s %> %^V2: ;
      	  Vow ([[Cns:] - [s]]+) Cx _ %> %^V2: ;
    where Cx in (z Z c C) ;

"Assimilation to stem-final sz"
 0:s <=> s _ z %> %^V2: ;
 Vow ([[Cns:] - [c | z]]+) s _ %> %^V2: ;

"v from V2"
 %^V2:v <=> [Vow: | Cns (y) %^Hist: | v ] %> _ Vow ;

"%^Ö2 to ö"
 %^Ö2:ö <=> [:ö | :ü |:ő | :ű] (Cns:+ ) %> (%^Ö2: ) Cns: _ Cns  ;
            [:ö | :ü |:ő | :ű] Cns:+ %> _ [n |m | d | t |k]  ;

"%^Ö2 to e"
 %^Ö2:e <=> [:e | :i |:é | :í] (Cns:+ ) %> (%^Ö2: ) Cns: _ Cns  ;
            [:e | :i |:é | :í] Cns:+ %> _ [n |m | d | t|k]  ;

"Deleting stem-final s in s genitive"
 s:0 <=> Vow s %>: _ ;

!!€ primus%>s
!!€ primus00

!!€grís%>s
!!€grís00

!!$grís%>s
!!$grís0s
